Florida, session 2026, HB333.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
36
37 Section 1. Section 473.301, Florida Statutes, is amended
38 to read:
39 473.301 Purpose.—The Legislature recognizes that there is
40 a public need for independent and objective certified public
41 accountants and that it is necessary to regulate the practice of
42 public accounting to assure the minimum competence of
43 practitioners and the accuracy of audit statements upon which
44 the public relies and to protect the public from dishonest
45 practitioners and, therefore, deems it necessary in the interest
46 of public welfare to regulate the practice of public accountancy
47 in this state.
48 Section 2. Subsection (9) of section 473.302, Florida
49 Statutes, is amended to read:
50 473.302 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
Page 2 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
51 (9) "Uniform Accountancy Act" means the Uniform
52 Accountancy Act, Eighth Edition, dated January 2018 and
53 published by the American Institute of Certified Public
54 Accountants and the National Association of State Boards of
55 Accountancy.
56
57 However, these terms shall not include services provided by the
58 American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or the
59 Florida Institute of Certified Public Accountants, or any full
60 service association of certified public accounting firms whose
61 plans of administration have been approved by the board, to
62 their members or services performed by these entities in
63 reviewing the services provided to the public by members of
64 these entities.
65 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 473.3035, Florida
66 Statutes, is amended to read:
67 473.3035 Division of Certified Public Accounting.—
68 (1) All services concerning this chapter, including, but
69 not limited to, recordkeeping services, examination services,
70 legal services, and investigative services, and those services
71 in chapter 455 necessary to perform the duties of this chapter
72 are shall be provided by the Division of Certified Public
73 Accounting. The board may, by majority vote, delegate a duty or
74 duties to the appropriate division within the department or
75 competitively procure contracted services pursuant to part I of
Page 3 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
76 chapter 287 for the performance of such duties, except for
77 investigative services. All such contracted services must be
78 fulfilled by corporations organized under chapter 617. The board
79 may, by majority vote, rescind any such delegation of duties or
80 contracted services at any time.
81 Section 4. Subsection (3) of section 473.306, Florida
82 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) of that section is
83 republished, to read:
84 473.306 Examinations.—
85 (3) An applicant is entitled to take the licensure
86 examination to practice in this state as a certified public
87 accountant if:
88 (a) The applicant has completed 120 semester hours or 180
89 quarter hours from an accredited college or university with a
90 concentration in accounting and business courses as prescribed
91 specified by the board by rule; and
92 (b) The applicant shows that she or he has good moral
93 character. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "good moral
94 character" has the same meaning as provided in s. 473.308(6)(a)
95 s. 473.308(7)(a). The board may refuse to allow an applicant to
96 take the licensure examination for failure to satisfy this
97 requirement if:
98 1. The board finds a reasonable relationship between the
99 lack of good moral character of the applicant and the
100 professional responsibilities of a certified public accountant;
Page 4 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
101 and
102 2. The finding by the board of lack of good moral
103 character is supported by competent substantial evidence.
104
105 If an applicant is found pursuant to this paragraph to be
106 unqualified to take the licensure examination because of a lack
107 of good moral character, the board must shall furnish to the
108 applicant a statement containing the findings of the board, a
109 complete record of the evidence upon which the determination was
110 based, and a notice of the rights of the applicant to a
111 rehearing and appeal.
112 (4) The board shall have the authority to establish the
113 standards for determining and shall determine:
114 (a) What constitutes a passing grade for each subject or
115 part of the licensure examination;
116 (b) Which educational institutions, in addition to the
117 universities in the State University System of Florida, shall be
118 deemed to be accredited colleges or universities;
119 (c) What courses and number of hours constitute a major in
120 accounting; and
121 (d) What courses and number of hours constitute additional
122 accounting courses acceptable under s. 473.308(4).
123 Section 5. Subsections (4) through (10) of section
124 473.308, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
125 473.308 Licensure.—
Page 5 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
126 (4)(a) An applicant for licensure must do at least one of
127 the following:
128 1. Complete have at least 150 semester hours of college
129 education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred
130 by an accredited college or university, with a concentration in
131 accounting and business as prescribed by the board in the total
132 educational program to the extent specified by the board.
133 2. Hold a master's degree in accounting or finance
134 conferred by an accredited college or university with a
135 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the
136 board.
137 3. Hold a baccalaureate degree in accounting or finance
138 conferred by an accredited college or university with a
139 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the
140 board.
141 4. Hold a baccalaureate degree in any major course of
142 study conferred by an accredited college or university and have
143 completed coursework required for a concentration in accounting
144 and business as prescribed by the board.
145 (b) The board shall prescribe the coursework required for
146 a concentration in accounting and business. The board may deem
147 an applicant to have satisfied requirements for such coursework
148 if the applicant receives a baccalaureate or higher degree in
149 accounting or finance conferred by an accredited college or
150 university in a state or territory of the United States. An
Page 6 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
151 applicant receiving a baccalaureate or higher degree with a
152 major course of study other than accounting or finance must
153 complete the coursework required for a concentration in
154 accounting and business as prescribed by the board.
155 (5)(a) An applicant for licensure who completes the
156 education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)1. or
157 subparagraph (4)(a)2. after December 31, 2008, must show that he
158 or she has had 1 year of work experience. An applicant who
159 completes the education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)3.
160 or subparagraph (4)(a)4. must show 2 years of work experience.
161 (b) Such work This experience includes shall include
162 providing any type of service or advice involving the use of
163 accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial
164 advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which must be
165 verified by a certified public accountant who is licensed by a
166 state or territory of the United States. This experience is
167 acceptable if it was gained through employment in government,
168 industry, academia, or public practice; constituted a
169 substantial part of the applicant's duties; and was verified by
170 a certified public accountant licensed by a state or territory
171 of the United States. The board shall adopt rules specifying
172 standards and providing for the review and approval of the work
173 experience required by this subsection section.
174 (b) However, an applicant who completed the requirements
175 of subsection (4) on or before December 31, 2008, and who passes
Page 7 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
176 the licensure examination on or before June 30, 2010, is exempt
177 from the requirements of this subsection.
178 (6)(a) An applicant for licensure must shall show that he
179 or she the applicant has good moral character. For purposes of
180 this paragraph, the term
181 (7)(a) "good moral character" means a personal history of
182 honesty, fairness, and respect for the rights of others and for
183 the laws of this state and nation.
184 (b) The board may refuse to certify an applicant for
185 failure to satisfy this requirement if:
186 1. The board finds a reasonable relationship between the
187 lack of good moral character of the applicant and the
188 professional responsibilities of a certified public accountant;
189 and
190 2. The finding by the board of lack of good moral
191 character is supported by competent substantial evidence.
192 (c) When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a
193 license because of a lack of good moral character, the board
194 shall furnish to the applicant a statement containing the
195 findings of the board, a complete record of the evidence upon
196 which the determination was based, and a notice of the rights of
197 the applicant to a rehearing and appeal.
198 (7)(8) The board shall certify as qualified for a license
199 by endorsement an applicant who:
200 (a) Is not licensed and has not been licensed in any state
Page 8 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
201 or territory and who has met the requirements of this section
202 for education, work experience, and good moral character and has
203 passed a national, regional, state, or territorial licensing
204 examination that is substantially equivalent to the examination
205 required by s. 473.306; or
206 (b)1. holds an active a valid license in good standing to
207 practice public accounting issued by another state or a
208 territory of the United States, if the applicant has maintained
209 good moral character and, at the time of licensure by such other
210 state or territory, the applicant was required to show evidence
211 of having obtained at least a baccalaureate degree from an
212 accredited college or university and having passed the Uniform
213 CPA Examination criteria for issuance of such license were
214 substantially equivalent to the licensure criteria that existed
215 in this state at the time the license was issued;
216 2. Holds a valid license to practice public accounting
217 issued by another state or territory of the United States but
218 the criteria for issuance of such license did not meet the
219 requirements of subparagraph 1.; has met the requirements of
220 this section for education, work experience, and good moral
221 character; and has passed a national, regional, state, or
222 territorial licensing examination that is substantially
223 equivalent to the examination required by s. 473.306; or
224 3. Holds a valid license to practice public accounting
225 issued by another state or territory of the United States for at
Page 9 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
226 least 10 years before the date of application; has passed a
227 national, regional, state, or territorial licensing examination
228 that is substantially equivalent to the examination required by
229 s. 473.306; and has met the requirements of this section for
230 good moral character.
231 (8)(9) An international applicant who seeks licensure as a
232 certified public accountant in this state must do at least one
233 of the following:
234 (a) Hold an active license in good standing to If the
235 applicant has at least 5 years of experience in the practice of
236 public accountancy in the United States or in the practice of
237 public accountancy or its equivalent in a foreign country that
238 the International Qualifications Appraisal Board of the National
239 Association of State Boards of Accountancy has determined has
240 licensure standards that are substantially equivalent to those
241 in the United States, or has at least 5 years of work experience
242 that meets the requirements of subsection (5), the board must
243 waive the requirements of subsection (4) which are in excess of
244 a baccalaureate degree. All experience that is used as a basis
245 for waiving the requirements of subsection (4) must be while
246 licensed as a certified public accountant by another state or
247 territory of the United States or while licensed in the practice
248 of public accounting, accountancy or its equivalent, in a
249 foreign country that the International Qualifications Appraisal
250 Board of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy
Page 10 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
251 has determined has licensure standards equal that are
252 substantially equivalent to those in the United States and has
253 passed an exam pursuant to s. 473.306(5).
254 (b) Hold an active license in good standing to practice
255 public accounting, or its equivalent, in a foreign country that
256 the International Qualifications Appraisal Board of the National
257 Association of State Boards of Accountancy has not determined
258 has licensure standards equal to those in the United States and
259 has met the requirements for education, work experience, and
260 good moral character under subsections (4), (5), and (6) and has
261 passed the Uniform CPA exam. The board shall have the authority
262 to establish the standards for experience that meet this
263 requirement.
264 (9)(10) The board may refuse to certify for licensure any
265 applicant who is under investigation in another state for any
266 act that would constitute a violation of this act or chapter
267 455, until such time as the investigation is complete and
268 disciplinary proceedings are have been terminated.
269 Section 6. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
270 473.312, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
271 473.312 Continuing education.—
272 (1)
273 (c) At least Not less than 5 percent of the total hours
274 required by the board must shall be in ethics applicable to the
275 practice of public accounting. This requirement shall be
Page 11 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
276 administered by providers approved by the board, and a majority
277 of the hours must shall include a review of the provisions of
278 chapter 455 and this chapter and the related administrative
279 rules. Such requirement must be administered by reputable
280 providers determined by the board. The board shall give
281 preference to corporations not for profit organized under
282 chapter 617 who are exempt from taxation under s. 501(c)(6) of
283 the Internal Revenue Code and who demonstrate their experience,
284 integrity, knowledge, practice, professional responsibility, and
285 representation of the largest numbers of certified public
286 accountants in this state.
287 Section 7. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 473.3141,
288 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
289 473.3141 Certified public accountants licensed in other
290 states.—
291 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, An
292 individual who holds an active license in good standing to
293 practice public accounting in another state or a territory of
294 the United States and who does not have an office in this state
295 has the privileges of Florida certified public accountants and
296 may provide public accounting services in this state without
297 obtaining a license under this chapter or notifying or
298 registering with the board or paying a fee if, at the time of
299 licensure by such other state or territory, the individual was
300 required to show evidence of having obtained at least a
Page 12 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
301 baccalaureate degree and having passed the Uniform CPA
302 Examination:
303 (a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant
304 from a state that the board or its designee has determined by
305 rule to have adopted standards that are substantially equivalent
306 to the certificate requirements in s. 5 of the Uniform
307 Accountancy Act in the issuance of licenses; or
308 (b) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant
309 from a state that has not been approved by the board as having
310 adopted standards in substantial equivalence with s. 5 of the
311 Uniform Accountancy Act, but obtains verification from the
312 board, or its designee, as determined by rule, that the
313 individual's certified public accountant qualifications are
314 substantially equivalent to the certificate requirements in s. 5
315 of the Uniform Accountancy Act.
316
317 The board shall define by rule what constitutes an office.
318 (3) An individual certified public accountant from another
319 state or a territory of the United States who practices pursuant
320 to this section, and the firm that employs that individual, must
321 shall both consent, as a condition of the privilege of
322 practicing in this state:
323 (a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and
324 disciplinary authority of the board;
325 (b) To comply with this chapter and the applicable board
Page 13 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
326 rules;
327 (c) That if the individual's license as a certified public
328 accountant from another the state or a territory of the United
329 States becomes invalid of the individual's principal place of
330 business is no longer valid, the individual must will cease
331 offering or rendering public accounting services in this state,
332 individually and on behalf of a firm; and
333 (d) To the appointment of the state board that issued the
334 individual's license as the agent upon whom process may be
335 served in any action or proceeding by the board or department
336 against the individual or firm.
337 Section 8. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
338 made by this act to section 473.312, Florida Statutes, in
339 references thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
340 473.311, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
341 473.311 Renewal of license.—
342 (1)
343 (b) A nonresident licensee seeking renewal of a license in
344 this state shall be determined to have met the continuing
345 education requirements in s. 473.312, except for the
346 requirements in s. 473.312(1)(c), if the licensee has complied
347 with the continuing education requirements applicable in the
348 state in which his or her office is located. If the state in
349 which the nonresident licensee's office is located has no
350 continuing education requirements for license renewals, the
Page 14 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 333 2026
351 nonresident licensee must comply with the continuing education
352 requirements in s. 473.312.
353 Section 9. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 15 of 15
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb333-00